West Virginia, session 2025, SB308.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 2. Authorization for Department of administration to promulgate legislative rules. §64-2-1. Office of Technology. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on August 29, 2024, authorized under the authority of §5A-6-4 of this code, modified by the Office of Technology to meet the objections of the Legislative Rule-Making Review Committee and refiled in the State Register on October 11, 2024, relating to the Office of Technology (plan of operation, 163 CSR 04), is authorized.